Alabama, session 2026rs, HB440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Judge of Probate of Escambia County,
in lieu of the fees prescribed by general law, shall charge
and collect the following fees for the following services:
(1) One hundred five dollars ($105) for the probate of
a will.
(2) One hundred five dollars ($105) for the
administration of intestate estate.
(3) Sixty-five dollars ($65) for name change.
(4) Sixty-five dollars ($65) for legitimation.
(5) One hundred forty-five dollars ($145) for
guardianship.
(6) One hundred forty-five dollars ($145) for
conservatorship.
(7) One hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for
adoption.
(8) Five dollars ($5) for claims against wills and
estates.
(9) Fifteen dollars ($15) plus five dollars ($5) per
page to file a will.
(10) Ten dollars ($10) for indexing.
(11) Thirty dollars ($30) for notary recording.
(12) Twenty-five dollars ($25) for Uniform Commercial
Code (UCC) instruments.
Page 1

Code (UCC) instruments.
HB440 Enrolled
(13) Five dollars ($5) for UCC release.
(14) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for plat recording.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a), the judge of
probate shall continue to charge and collect the service fees
that are prescribed by general law.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB440 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3